Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1120
Termination of designation.

When the owner or owners of all of the contiguous tracts of real estate designated as an industrial area as provided by sections 13-1111 to 13-1118, shall file with the county board of the county in which such real estate is located, or the greater portion of such real estate, a petition requesting that the designation of the whole of the real estate as an industrial area be terminated, the county board shall enter an order determining that such real estate shall no longer be an industrial area. When a certified copy of such order is filed with the register of deeds and county assessor of the county or counties in which the real estate is located, such real estate shall no longer be an industrial area.

Laws 1975, LB 151, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-2510.